Massachusetts, session 194th, H5377.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
1 SECTION 1. To provide for supplementing certain items in the general appropriation act
2 and other appropriation acts for fiscal year 2026, the sums set forth in section 2 are hereby
3 appropriated from the General Fund or the Transitional Escrow Fund established in section 16 of
4 chapter 76 of the acts of 2021, as amended by section 4 of chapter 98 of the acts of 2022, unless
5 specifically designated otherwise in this act or in those appropriation acts, for the several
6 purposes and subject to the conditions specified in this act or in those appropriation acts, and
7 subject to the laws regulating the disbursement of public funds for the fiscal year ending June 30,
8 2026. These sums shall be in addition to any amounts previously appropriated and made
9 available for the purposes of those items. These sums shall be made available through the fiscal
10 year ending June 30, 2026.
1 of 43

11 SECTION 2.
12 EXECUTIVE OFFICE FOR ADMINISTRATION AND FINANCE
13 Office of the Secretary
14 1595-6153 No Cost Call Trust Fund Transfer…………………………….$22,520,889
15 Department of Revenue
16 1233-2401 Chapter 40S Education Payments………………………………$731,409
17 EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
18 Department of Public Health
19 4512-0200 Bureau of Substance Addiction Services……………………...$14,071,288
20 EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF HOUSING AND LIVABLE COMMUNITIES
21 Housing and Livable Communities
22 7004-0100 Operation of Homelessness Programs………………………….$8,181,007
23 7004-9315 Low-Income Housing Tax Credit Fee Retained Revenue……...$2,000,000
24 EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF PUBLIC SAFETY AND SECURITY
25 Office of the Chief Medical Examiner
26 8000-0105 Office of the Chief Medical Examiner…………………………$1,133,659
27 Massachusetts State Police
2 of 43

28 8100-0102 Troop F Retained Revenue……………………………………..$3,000,000
29 8100-1004 State Police Crime Laboratory………………………………….$2,881,350
30 Military Division
31 8700-0001 Military Division………………………………………………..$1,733,000
32 Massachusetts Emergency Management Agency
33 8800-0001 Massachusetts Emergency Management Agency………………$9,470,266
34 SECTION 2A. To provide for certain unanticipated obligations of the commonwealth, to
35 provide for an alteration of purpose for current appropriations, and to meet certain requirements
36 of law, the sums set forth in this section are hereby appropriated from the General Fund or the
37 Transitional Escrow Fund established in section 16 of chapter 76 of the acts of 2021, as amended
38 by section 4 of chapter 98 of the acts of 2022, unless specifically designated otherwise in this
39 section, for the several purposes and subject to the conditions specified in this section, and
40 subject to the laws regulating the disbursement of public funds for the fiscal year ending June 30,
41 2026. Except as otherwise stated, these sums shall be made available through the fiscal year
42 ending June 30, 2027.
43 MASSACHUSETTS DISTRICT ATTORNEYS’ ASSOCIATION
44 0340-0403 For technology costs related to Massachusetts Criminal Procedure Rule 14
45 implementation; provided, that funds may be transferred to the district attorneys' offices for this
46 purpose………………………………………………………………………………….$1,750,000
47 TRANSPORTATION
3 of 43

48 Massachusetts Department of Transportation
49 1596-2527 For the cost of snow and ice removal services incurred by the
50 Massachusetts Department of Transportation and the department of conservation and recreation;
51 provided, that funds in this item may be transferred to the Massachusetts Transportation Trust
52 Fund established under section 4 of chapter 6C of the General Laws; and provided further, that
53 funds in this item may be transferred to the department of conservation and
54 recreation……………………………………………………………………………$159,800,000
55 Education and Transportation Fund…100%
56 SECTION 3. Subsection (k) of section 2 of chapter 6C of the General Laws, as appearing
57 in the 2024 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 145, the words
58 “$15,000,000 or more” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- more than
59 $30,000,000.
60 SECTION 4. Chapter 7 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 Official Edition, is
61 hereby amended by inserting after section 22P the following section:-
62 Section 22Q. Notwithstanding section 39M of chapter 30, or any general or special law to
63 the contrary, a governmental body may, in a single procurement under this chapter, procure: (i)
64 broadband internet service; (ii) the design, installation, maintenance and operation of fiber optic
65 cables and other equipment to provide broadband internet service to a public building or
66 buildings; (iii) the design, installation, maintenance and operation of a wireless communication
67 network for a public building or public land or (iv) any combination of the foregoing. All such
68 fiber optic cables, wireless network equipment and other physical improvements designed,
69 installed, maintained and operated pursuant to such procurement shall be considered supplies.
4 of 43

70 SECTION 5. Section 5 of chapter 7C of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024
71 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in lines 4 and 13, the figure “$250,000”,
72 each time it appears, and inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the following words:- the
73 estimated construction cost described in the first sentence of the third paragraph of section 59.
74 SECTION 6. Said section 5 of said chapter 7C, as so appearing, is hereby further
75 amended by striking out, in line 9, the figure “$5,000,000” and inserting in place thereof the
76 following figure:- $8,500,000.
77 SECTION 7. Said section 5 of said chapter 7C, as so appearing, is hereby further
78 amended by striking out, in line 17, the figure “$10,000,000” and inserting in place thereof the
79 following figure:- $17,000,000.
80 SECTION 8. Section 9 of said chapter 7C, as so appearing, is hereby amended by striking
81 out, in lines 8 and 27, the figure “$25,000”, each time it appears, and inserting in place thereof,
82 in each instance, the following figure:- $50,000.
83 SECTION 9. Section 29 of said chapter 7C, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
84 striking out, in line 5, the figure “$25,000” and inserting in place thereof the following words:-
85 the estimated construction cost described in the first sentence of the third paragraph of section
86 59.
87 SECTION 10. Section 46 of said chapter 7C, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
88 striking out, in line 68, the figure “$30,000” and inserting in place thereof the following figure:-
89 $50,000.
5 of 43

90 SECTION 11. Said section 46 of said chapter 7C, as so appearing, is hereby further
91 amended by striking out, in line 70, the figure “$300,000” and inserting in place thereof the
92 following figure:- $500,000.
93 SECTION 12. Section 51 of said chapter 7C, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
94 striking out, in line 51, the figure “$30,000” and inserting in place thereof the following figure:-
95 $50,000.
96 SECTION 13. Said section 51 of said chapter 7C, as so appearing, is hereby further
97 amended by striking out, in line 53, the figure “$300,000” and inserting in place thereof the
98 following figure:- $500,000.
99 SECTION 14. Section 54 of said chapter 7C, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
100 striking out, in line 56, the figure “$30,000” and inserting in place thereof the following figure:-
101 $50,000.
102 SECTION 15. Said section 54 of said chapter 7C, as so appearing, is hereby further
103 amended by striking out, in line 58, the figure “$300,000” and inserting in place thereof the
104 following figure:- $500,000.
105 SECTION 16. Section 59 of said chapter 7C, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
106 striking out, in lines 18 to 20, inclusive, the words “No provider of design services for any
107 building project for which a state agency is the using agency shall be selected by the designer
108 selection board or by the administering agency and” and inserting in place thereof the following
109 words:- For any building project with an estimated construction cost greater than $500,000,.
6 of 43

110 SECTION 17. Section 35 of chapter 10 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024
111 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the words “In order to provide local property
112 tax relief and continue services at the local level, revenues of the lottery commission from
113 whatever source”, in lines 7 to 9, inclusive, and inserting in place thereof the following words:-
114 (i) In order to provide local property tax relief and continue services at the local level, revenues
115 of the lottery commission from sales pursuant to subparagraph (a) of section 25 of chapter 10.
116 SECTION 18. Said section 35 of said chapter 10, as so appearing, is hereby further
117 amended by adding the following subparagraph:- (ii) In order to expand access to affordable,
118 high-quality childcare, revenues of the lottery commission from sales pursuant to subparagraph
119 (b) of said section 25 shall be expended only for the following purposes:
120 (a) For the payment of prizes to the holders of winning lottery tickets or shares;
121 (b) For the expenses of the commission in administering and operating the lottery;
122 (c) For the early education and care operational grant fund established by section 19 of
123 chapter 15D, subject to appropriation; and
124 (d) For the purposes of accommodating discrepancies between the receipt of revenues
125 and related expenditures, the commission may incur expenses and the comptroller may certify
126 for payment expenses incurred in anticipation of revenues.
127 SECTION 19. Subsection (a) of section 78 of said chapter 10, as so appearing, is hereby
128 amended by adding the following 4 paragraphs:-
129 As used in this section, the term “Korean Emergency” shall mean the period on or after
130 June 25, 1950 to January 31, 1955.
7 of 43

131 As used in this section, the term “Persian Gulf War” shall mean the period on or after
132 August 2, 1990 to April 10, 1991.
133 As used in this section, the term “Vietnam Conflict” shall mean the period on or after
134 July 1, 1958 to May 17, 1975.
135 As used in this section, the term “World War II” shall mean the period on or after
136 September 16, 1940 to July 25, 1947.
137 SECTION 20. Subparagraph (1) of subsection (b) of said section 78 of said chapter 10, as
138 so appearing, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “served”, in line 17, the following
139 words:- , or is currently serving,.
140 SECTION 21. Said subparagraph (1) of said subsection (b) of said section 78 of said
141 chapter 10, as so appearing, is hereby further amended by striking out, in lines 22 through 24,
142 inclusive, the words “have been in the commonwealth for a period of not less than 6 months
143 before the time of the person's entry into the service” and inserting in place thereof the following
144 words:- be the commonwealth.
145 SECTION 22. Subparagraph (5) of said subsection (b) of said section 78 of said chapter
146 10, as so appearing, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “Medal”, in line 49, the
147 following words:- , or equivalent Expeditionary Medal,.
148 SECTION 23. Said subparagraph (5) of said subsection (b) of said section 78 of said
149 chapter 10, as so appearing, is hereby further amended by striking out, in lines 55 through 57,
150 inclusive, the words “have been in the commonwealth for a period of not less than 6 months
8 of 43

151 immediately before the time of the person's entry into service” and inserting in place thereof the
152 following words:- be the commonwealth.
153 SECTION 24. Said subsection (b) of said section 78 of said chapter 10, as so appearing,
154 is hereby further amended by adding the following subparagraph:-
155 (6) Upon application, as provided in this section and as specified in rules and regulations
156 established by the treasurer, there shall be allowed and paid out of the treasury of the
157 commonwealth, without further appropriation, the sums specified in such rules and regulations to
158 each person who has served in the armed forces of the United States in active service as part of
159 World War II, the Korean Emergency, the Vietnam War or the Persian Gulf War; provided,
160 however, that the domicile of a person on account of whose service the application is filed shall
161 be the commonwealth; and provided further, that any veteran discharged or released under other
162 than honorable conditions due to sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression or HIV
163 status based on the veteran's DD-214 form or equivalent documentation shall be eligible for a
164 bonus under this section.
165 SECTION 25. Subsection (e) of said section 78 of said chapter 10, as so appearing, is
166 hereby amended by striking out the fifth and sixth sentences.
167 SECTION 26. Said subsection (e) of said section 78 of said chapter 10, as so appearing,
168 is hereby further amended by striking out, in line 101, the word “section” and inserting in place
169 thereof the following word:- act.
170 SECTION 27. Said subsection (e) of said section 78 of said chapter 10, as so appearing,
171 is hereby further amended by striking out, in lines 111 and 112, the word “designed” and
172 inserting in place thereof the following word:- designated.
9 of 43

173 SECTION 28. Subsection (g) of said section 78 of said chapter 10, as so appearing, is
174 hereby amended by inserting after the word “service”, in line 123, the following words:- during
175 the enlistment period.
176 SECTION 29. Paragraph (i) of subsection (a) of section 7 of chapter 15D of the General
177 Laws, as appearing in the 2024 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in lines 38 to
178 41, inclusive, the words “and all supported findings and pending investigations of abuse or
179 neglect available through the department of children and families consistent with sections 51B,
180 51E, and 51F of chapter 119” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- all supported
181 findings and pending investigations of abuse or neglect available through the department of
182 children and families consistent with sections 51B, 51E and 51F of chapter 119, and information
183 contained in the disabled persons protection commission registry of abusive care providers as
184 defined in section 15 of chapter 19C.
185 SECTION 30. Paragraph (ii) of said subsection (a) of said section 7 of said chapter 15D,
186 as so appearing, is hereby further amended by adding the following sentence:- The department
187 shall further obtain all information contained in the disabled persons protection commission
188 registry of abusive care providers consistent with section 15 of chapter 19C.
189 SECTION 31. Paragraph (F) of section 30 of chapter 23B of the General Laws, as
190 appearing in the 2024 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting, in line 180, after the
191 word “appeal.”, the following sentence:- Provided, however, that assistance shall not be
192 continued during the period of appeal for a termination arising from: (a) a reasonable cause to
193 believe that a member of the household is engaging in or engaged in a criminal or significantly
10 of 43

194 dangerous activity that threatens the health, safety or security of self, other residents, guests or
195 staff or (b) a lack of children or pregnant women remaining in the household.
196 SECTION 32. Subparagraph (1) of paragraph (G) of said section 30 of said chapter 23B,
197 as so appearing, is hereby amended by inserting after the definition of “Non-state-funded
198 overflow emergency shelter site” the following definition:-
199 “Rapid track site”, a shelter site for unhoused families in the commonwealth that is
200 eligible to receive funding as a temporary respite site under item 1599-2625 of section 2A of
201 chapter 1 of the acts of 2025.
202 SECTION 33. Subparagraph (3) of said paragraph (G) of said section 30 of said chapter
203 23B, as amended by section 4 of chapter 1 of the acts of 2025, is hereby further amended by
204 striking out the figure “6” and inserting in place thereof the following figure:- 9.
205 SECTION 34. Said paragraph (G) of said section 30 of said chapter 23B, as so amended,
206 is hereby further amended by striking out subparagraph (8) and inserting in place thereof the
207 following subparagraph:-
208 (8) The executive office shall maintain rapid track sites that shall be available to eligible
209 families, as determined by an assessment of family risk pursuant to guidance issued by the
210 executive office, and shall be subject to appropriation, rules, regulations and availability, for a
211 period of not more than 30 days, subject to any extensions upon written certification by the
212 secretary of housing and livable communities; provided further, that rapid track sites shall only
213 be available to families who provide information sufficient to comply with paragraph (C½);
214 provided further, that the length of stay at a rapid track site shall constitute a benefit received
215 under the emergency housing assistance program for the purpose of calculating length of stay
11 of 43

216 limit under subparagraph (3) of paragraph (G); provided further, that placement in a rapid track
217 site shall not make a family ineligible for the bridge shelter track after proving eligibility
218 pursuant to section 7 of chapter 1 of the acts of 2025. This subparagraph shall apply during any
219 period in which the secretary of housing and livable communities has determined that the shelter
220 system is no longer able to meet all current and projected demand for shelter from eligible
221 families considering the facts and circumstances then existing in the commonwealth.
222 SECTION 35. Section 5 of chapter 23J of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024
223 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in lines 10, 11 and 22, the words “August
224 15”, each time they appear, and inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the following words:-
225 January 30.
226 SECTION 36. Section 9A of said chapter 23J, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
227 striking out subsection (d) and inserting in place thereof the following subsection:-
228 (d) The center shall make no expenditure from the trust fund unless: (i) the expenditure
229 has been approved by a majority vote of the board; (ii) the center finds, to the extent possible,
230 that a definite benefit to the commonwealth's economy may reasonably be expected from said
231 expenditure; and (iii) the expenditure conforms with any rules the board may adopt to administer
232 the trust fund. In evaluating a request or application for funding, the center shall consider the
233 following: (A) the appropriateness of the project; (B) whether the project has significant
234 potential to expand employment; (C) the project's potential to enhance technological
235 advancements; (D) the project's potential for leveraging additional funding or attracting
236 resources to the commonwealth and (E) the project's potential to promote manufacturing in the
237 commonwealth.
12 of 43

238 SECTION 37. Section 11C of chapter 25A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024
239 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 29, the words “$1 million” and
240 inserting in place thereof the following figure:- $3,000,000.
241 SECTION 38. Chapter 26 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 Official Edition,
242 is hereby amended by inserting after section 8M the following section:-
243 Section 8N. The commissioner is hereby authorized to make and collect an assessment
244 against pharmacy benefit managers licensed by the commissioner to pay for the expenses related
245 to the regulation and oversight of pharmacy benefit managers, including to defray the salaries of
246 any financial analysts, licensing staff, market conduct specialists, attorneys, special investigators,
247 staff with expertise in pharmacy and pharmaceutical processes, senior health researchers,
248 administrative staff or any other staff as may be necessary to carry out this function. Said
249 assessment shall be made at a rate sufficient to produce at least $1,000,000 annually and credited
250 to the General Fund. The amount collected under this section shall be credited to the funds to
251 which the appropriations for the division of insurance are charged.
252 The assessment shall be allocated on a fair and reasonable basis among all pharmacy
253 benefit managers licensed by the commissioner. The funds produced by said assessments shall be
254 expended by the division, in addition to any other funds which may be appropriated, to assist in
255 defraying the general operating expenses related to the regulation and oversight of pharmacy
256 benefit managers and may be used to compensate consultants retained by the commissioner for
257 this purpose. A pharmacy benefit manager licensed by the commissioner shall pay the amount so
258 assessed against it within 30 days after the date of the notice of assessment from the
259 commissioner.
13 of 43

260 SECTION 39. Section 39M of chapter 30 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024
261 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in lines 21, 54, 57, 63, 66 and 163, each time
262 it appears, the figure “$50,000”, and inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the following
263 figure:- $75,000.
264 SECTION 40. Said section 39M of said chapter 30, as so appearing, is hereby further
265 amended by striking out, in line 67, the figure “$150,000” and inserting in place thereof the
266 following figure:- $250,000.
267 SECTION 41. Section 39R of said chapter 30, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
268 striking out, in lines 5 to 6, 12 to 13, and 60 to 61, the words “thirty-eight A½ to thirty-eight O,
269 inclusive, of chapter seven”, each time it appears, and inserting in place thereof, in each instance,
270 the following words:- 44 to 57, inclusive, of chapter 7C.
271 SECTION 42. The first paragraph of subsection 4 of section 16 of chapter 32 of the
272 General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the
273 following 6 sentences:- If the chair of the board determines that the volume of appeals has
274 resulted in a backlog, the chair may, in writing, inform the attorney general, the public employee
275 retirement administration commission, and the governor of the backlog and need for additional
276 board members to address it. If the backlog involves matters related to disability retirement or
277 interim benefits, the chair may also, in writing, inform the secretary of health and human
278 services. Upon notification by the chair of a backlog of appeals to the board, the attorney
279 general, the public employee retirement administration commission, the governor, and, if such
280 backlog involves matters related to disability retirement or interim benefits, the secretary of
281 health and human services, shall, subject to availability of staffing, each designate or appoint
14 of 43

282 such number of additional members as determined by the chair, but not more than 4 additional
283 members each. The secretary of health and human services may designate qualified staff from
284 agencies within the executive office. The additional members shall be designated or appointed in
285 the manner and ratio of the board itself to serve on the contributory retirement appeal board for
286 not more than 3 years. The assistant attorney general designated as the chair shall organize such
287 additional members into panels assigned to each matter pending before the contributory
288 retirement appeal board, and a panel so organized shall be empowered to decide and resolve the
289 appeal; provided that each panel so organized shall consist of three members reflecting the
290 membership of the board with a chair of the panel as determined by the chair of the board.
291 SECTION 43. Chapter 46 of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking out section
292 2A and inserting in place thereof the following section:-
293 Section 2A. The department may issue regulations to ensure that sensitive information of
294 a highly personal nature collected and recorded pursuant to section 1, which shall include but not
295 be limited to social security numbers, is not examined nor copy provided except upon proper
296 judicial order, or upon request of a person seeking their own birth or marriage record, or their
297 attorney, parent, guardian, or conservator, or upon request of a person who has a legitimate need
298 to access a vital record as specified in department regulations, or persons whose official duties,
299 in the opinion of the town clerk or the state registrar of vital records, as the case may be, entitle
300 them to the information contained therein. Copies of vital records to authorized individuals shall
301 only be available as certified copies pursuant to section 33, and non-certified copies shall not be
302 considered public records under clause Twenty-sixth of section 7 of chapter 4. The provisions of
303 this section shall not apply (i) to records of birth or marriage older than 90 years, or (ii) to
304 records of death older than 50 years.
15 of 43

305 SECTION 44. Section 12 of said chapter 46, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
306 striking out the last sentence.
307 SECTION 45. Subsection (c) of section 13, and sections 19B and 24 of said chapter 46,
308 as so appearing, are hereby repealed.
309 SECTION 46. The General Laws are hereby amended by inserting after chapter 93L the
310 following chapter:-
311 CHAPTER 93M
312 ONLINE PROTECTION
313 Section 1. As used in this chapter, the following words shall, unless the context clearly
314 requires otherwise, have the following meanings:-
315 “Account”, a unique profile for a user of a social media platform.
316 “Algorithmic ranking system”, an automated computational process, including a process
317 derived from algorithmic decision making, machine learning, statistical analysis or other data
318 processing or artificial intelligence techniques, used to determine the selection, order, relative
319 prioritization or relative prominence of content to be recommended or displayed to a user based,
320 in whole or in part, on information associated with the user, the user’s device or the user’s
321 previous interactions with content shared by other users.
322 “Autoplay”, a feature of a social media feed or landing page where content is
323 automatically and continuously played in a social media feed without any manual input from a
324 user.
16 of 43

325 “Content”, text, image, audio or video created, shared or accessed through a social media
326 platform.
327 “Connected account”, an account directly connected to another account by an affirmative
328 request by 1 user and an affirmative confirmation by another user.
329 “Educational technology platform”, a software application or web-based technology,
330 including but not limited to Learning Management Systems (LMS), designed to provide school-
331 home communication, educational information, experiences, training or instruction to build
332 knowledge, skills or a craft, provided that, for purposes of this chapter: (i) the software
333 application or web-based technology is approved by the school district for the purpose of
334 communicating with parents or for conveying educational content to students; (ii) the school
335 district complies with the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974 (FERPA), 20
336 U.S.C. 1232g, and its implementing regulations, 34 C.F.R. Part 99, in its use of any software
337 application or web-based technology; and (iii) the school district has an executed student data
338 privacy agreement governing the use of any software application or web-based technology that
339 collects student data that includes a requirement that the software application or web-based
340 technology complies with FERPA, 20 U.S.C. 1232g and 34 C.F.R. Part 99.
341 “Infinite scroll”, a feature of a social media feed or landing page that provides an
342 automatically and continuously loading social media feed or landing page where additional
343 content displays at the bottom of such feed or landing page without any manual input from a
344 user.
345 “Minor”, a user or prospective user who is under 18 years of age.
346 “Parent”, a parent or legal guardian.
17 of 43

347 “Precise geolocation data”, information derived from technology, including, but not
348 limited to, latitude and longitude coordinates from global positioning system mechanisms or
349 other similar positional data, that reveals the past or present physical location of an individual or
350 device that identifies or is linked or reasonably linkable to 1 or more individuals with precision
351 and accuracy within a radius of 1,750 feet.
352 “Social media feed”, the presentation of content to users of a social media platform that
353 has been recommended, selected or prioritized for presentation or display to a user.
354 “Social media platform”, a public or semi-public website, online service, online
355 application or mobile application that primarily serves as a medium for displaying content
356 generated by users through a social media feed, and that allows users to create an account or
357 profile to post, share, view and interact with user-generated content, provided however, that the
358 following services shall not be included: (i) email, SMS, MMS, RCS or similar text messaging
359 telecommunications; (ii) cloud storage services or document viewing, sharing or collaboration
360 services; and (iii) an educational technology platform.
361 “User”, a Massachusetts resident who accesses or uses a social media platform by
362 establishing an account or profile, or seeks to establish such an account or profile.
363 “User-directed feed”, a social media feed in which the content presented has been
364 recommended, selected or prioritized for display based solely on the user’s expressly selected
365 preferences, including content from connected accounts, content the user has subscribed to or
366 content presented in response to a specific search inquiry by the user and that is displayed in
367 chronological order or another sequence not based on an algorithmic ranking system.
18 of 43

368 Section 2. (a) A social media platform shall implement an age assurance system to
369 determine whether a user is a minor and, if so, to accurately identify a user’s age to determine the
370 proper level of access to the social media platform’s features pursuant to this section. The
371 attorney general may promulgate regulations identifying commercially reasonable and
372 technically feasible age assurance methods with measures reasonably calculated to accurately
373 identify a user’s age and to identify the appropriate level of accuracy required.
374 (b) A social media platform shall implement a review process to allow users to appeal the
375 social media platform’s designation of the user’s age by submitting documentary evidence to the
376 social media platform to establish that the user is not a minor and the social media platform shall
377 review the documentary evidence submitted and make a determination on the appeal within 3
378 days.
379 (c) Any data or information collected and stored by the social media platform for use in
380 the age assurance system, or during any appeal of the age assurance system’s determination,
381 shall not be used for any purpose other than age assurance and shall be deleted within 10 days of
382 an age determination or resolution of any appeal, except as necessary for compliance with any
383 applicable state or federal law or regulation.
384 Section 3. (a) Upon determination that an account belongs to a minor user, a social media
385 platform shall set the default settings of the minor user to ensure a heightened level of privacy
386 and limit the use of features that prolong that minor’s engagement with the social media
387 platform. The default settings shall include, but not be limited to:
388 (i) restricting the visibility of the minor user’s account to only connected accounts;
19 of 43

389 (ii) disabling the visibility or sharing of the minor user’s precise geolocation data with
390 other users;
391 (iii) limiting the minor user to only sharing content with connected accounts;
392 (iv) limiting the minor user to only direct messaging with connected accounts;
393 (v) presenting or displaying only a user-directed feed;
394 (vi) disabling autoplay or other auto-advance functions that continuously present content
395 to a user;
396 (vii) disabling infinite scroll or other endless scrolling or pagination functions;
397 (viii) disabling notifications to the minor user concerning a social media feed between the
398 hours of 10:00 p.m. and 7:00 a.m. and during hours when school is typically in session;
399 (ix) restricting a minor user from accessing the social media platform between the hours
400 of 10:00 p.m. and 7:00 a.m. and during hours when school is typically in session;
401 (x) providing a clear and conspicuous reminder to a minor user after accessing the social
402 media platform for more than 1 cumulative hour of use in any 24 hour period, and every 30
403 minutes of cumulative use thereafter, provided that the social media platform shall require the
404 minor user to acknowledge the reminder before proceeding to use the social media platform; and
405 (xi) restricting a minor user from accessing any social media platform for more than 2
406 cumulative hours of use in any 24 hour period.
20 of 43

407 (b) The default settings provided in subsection (a) for a minor user of a social media
408 platform who is 15 years old or younger may be changed with parental consent pursuant to
409 section 5.
410 (c) The default settings provided in subsection (a) for a minor user of a social media
411 platform may be changed by a minor user who is 16 years old or older.
412 (d) The default settings provided in clause (ii) of subsection (a) for a minor user of a
413 social media platform shall be adjustable in a manner that allows the sharing of the minor user’s
414 precise geolocation location data with only selected individual connected accounts.
415 (e) A social media platform shall restrict from public visibility a minor user’s account
416 within 1 hour of receiving a request for a restriction by a parent of a minor user who is 15 years
417 old or younger or by a minor user and shall delete a minor user’s account within 3 days of
418 receiving a request for a deletion by a parent of a minor user who is 15 years old or younger or
419 by a minor user. Any restriction or deletion pursuant to this subsection shall include all
420 information and material made publicly available by the minor user on the social media platform.
421 Nothing in this subsection shall require a social media platform to contravene any federal or state
422 law or regulation or require a social media platform to delete information subject to a law
423 enforcement investigation.
424 (f) A social media platform shall provide a conspicuous tool with each item of content to
425 allow a minor user the ability to flag or otherwise indicate that the minor user found the content
426 to be unwanted or harmful.
427 (g) A social media platform shall provide a conspicuous tool that enables a parent of a
428 minor user who is 15 years old or younger or a minor user to reset the algorithmic ranking
21 of 43

429 system applied to the minor user’s social media feed such that it clears the learned
430 recommendation profile based on the minor user’s previous interactions with content.
431 (h) A social media platform shall present clear and conspicuous warnings on the negative
432 effects of social media use on social, emotional and physical health in at least the following
433 circumstances: (i) upon the activation of a minor user’s account and every 30 days thereafter,
434 provided that the social media platform shall require the minor user to acknowledge the warning
435 before proceeding to use the social media platform; (ii) whenever a parent seeks to adjust the
436 default settings of a minor user of a social media platform pursuant to subsection (b) of section 3,
437 provided that the social media platform shall require the parent to acknowledge the warning
438 before proceeding to adjust the default settings and (iii) whenever a minor seeks to adjust the
439 default settings of a social media platform pursuant to subsection (c) of section 3, provided that
440 the social media platform shall require the minor to acknowledge the warning before proceeding
441 to adjust the default settings.
442 The attorney general may, in consultation with the department of public health, the
443 department of mental health and the department of elementary and secondary education,
444 promulgate regulations setting forth the text and manner of presenting such warnings taking into
445 consideration medical and sociological research, including from government publications and
446 peer-reviewed scholarly articles.
447 (j) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as preventing any action taken in good faith
448 to restrict access to or availability of content that a social media platform considers to be
449 obscene, lewd, lascivious, excessively violent, harassing or otherwise objectionable or harmful
450 content, whether or not such content is constitutionally protected.
22 of 43

451 Section 4. (a) A social media platform shall clearly and conspicuously post de-identified
452 aggregate data on minors’ use of the social media platform on its website on at least a quarterly
453 basis. Such data shall include but not be limited to: (i) the number of minors who use the
454 platform, broken down by age or age range; (ii) the amount of time minor users spend on the
455 platform, broken down by age or age range; and (iii) the frequency and type of modification of
456 default settings for social media accounts used by minors. The attorney general may promulgate
457 regulations requiring the reporting of additional de-identified aggregate data about minors’ use of
458 social media platforms.
459 (b) Every 30 days, the social media platform shall survey minor users to determine
460 whether, and to what extent, each minor user has experienced unwanted or harmful activity on
461 the social media platform. The social media platform shall make available de-identified
462 aggregate data on the results of these surveys and the flagging of unwanted or harmful content
463 pursuant to subsection (f) of section 3 on its website on at least a quarterly basis.
464 Section 5. A social media platform shall establish a mechanism by which the parent of a
465 minor user may adjust the default settings pursuant to subsection (b) of section 3 or reset the
466 algorithmic ranking system applied to the minor user’s social media feed pursuant to subsection
467 (g) of section 3; provided, however, nothing in this chapter shall be construed as requiring a
468 social media platform to provide a parent any additional or special access to or control over the
469 data or accounts of their minor user child.
470 Section 6. A violation by a social media platform of the provisions of this chapter shall be
471 deemed an unfair or deceptive act or practice in trade or commerce under the provisions of
472 chapter 93A. A violation of section 2 or section 3 shall be punished by a civil fine of not more
23 of 43

473 than $5,000 per violation. Each user affected by a violation of section 2 or section 3 shall be
474 considered a separate violation under this section. A violation of section 4 shall be punished by a
475 civil fine of not more than $1,000,000. Each day that a violation of section 4 occurs shall be
476 considered a separate violation under this section.
477 Section 7. The attorney general may promulgate regulations necessary to effectuate the
478 purposes of this chapter.
479 SECTION 47. Section 72W of chapter 111 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024
480 Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following paragraph:-
481 The department of public health may, without a prior hearing, suspend or refuse to renew
482 the certification of a certified nurses’ aide who poses an immediate and serious threat to the
483 public health, safety or welfare, provided a hearing is afforded to the certified nurses’ aide,
484 pursuant to chapter 30A, within 7 days of the department’s action to determine whether such
485 summary action was warranted.
486 SECTION 48. Section 72W½ of said chapter 111, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
487 inserting after subsection (g) the following subsection:-
488 (h) The department of public health may, without a prior hearing, suspend or refuse to
489 renew the certification of a certified medication aide who poses an immediate and serious threat
490 to the public health safety or welfare, provided a hearing is afforded to the certified medication
491 aide, pursuant to chapter 30A, within 7 days of the department’s action to determine whether
492 such summary action was warranted.
24 of 43

493 SECTION 49. Said chapter 112, as so appearing, is hereby amended by inserting after
494 section 61 the following section:-
495 Section 61½. A board of registration under the supervision of the department of public
496 health may, without a prior hearing, suspend or refuse to renew the license of a licensee who
497 poses an immediate and serious threat to the public health, safety or welfare, provided a hearing
498 is afforded to the licensee, pursuant to chapter 30A, within 7 days of the board’s action to
499 determine whether such summary action was warranted.
500 SECTION 50. Section 1 of chapter 131 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024
501 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the definition of “Angling” the following
502 definition:- “Archery equipment”, any bow, arrow, bolt, or crossbow.
503 SECTION 51. Section 57 of said chapter 131, as so appearing, is hereby repealed.
504 SECTION 52. Section 58 of said chapter 131, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
505 striking out, in lines 1 and 2, the words “or release any arrow” and inserting in place thereof the
506 following words:- or hunt by any means.
507 SECTION 53. Said section 58 of said chapter 131, as so appearing, is hereby further
508 amended by adding the following 2 sentences:- Notwithstanding the previous sentence, a person
509 shall not discharge archery equipment upon or across a state highway or hard surfaced highway,
510 or within 150 feet, of any such highway, or hunt with archery equipment on the land of another
511 within 250 feet of a dwelling in use, except as authorized by the owner or occupant thereof.
512 Nothing in this section shall apply to falconry.
25 of 43

513 SECTION 54. Section 60 of said chapter 131, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
514 striking out, in lines 1, 5 and 6, the words “bow and arrow”, each time they appear, and inserting
515 in place thereof, in each instance, the following words:- archery equipment.
516 SECTION 55. Section 61 of said chapter 131, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
517 striking out, in line 1, the words “bow and arrow” and inserting in place thereof the following
518 words:- archery equipment.
519 SECTION 56. Section 62 of said chapter 131, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
520 striking out, in lines 7 and 8, the words “bow and arrow” and inserting in place thereof the
521 following words:- archery equipment.
522 SECTION 57. Section 64 of said chapter 131, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
523 striking out, in lines 2 and 3, the words “or any crossbow, except as provided in section 69,”.
524 SECTION 58. Section 65A of said chapter 131, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
525 striking out, in line 5, the words “bow and arrow” and inserting in place thereof the words:-
526 archery equipment.
527 SECTION 59. Said chapter 131, as so appearing, is hereby further amended by striking
528 out section 69 and inserting in place thereof the following section:-
529 Section 69. A person shall not carry or use archery equipment while hunting except in
530 compliance with regulations of the division. The director is hereby authorized to promulgate
531 regulations to implement this section. Such regulations shall prescribe general design and weight
532 of pull and type of archery equipment, and shall conform to standards generally accepted for
533 hunting purposes.
26 of 43

534 SECTION 60. Section 29 of chapter 149 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024
535 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 6, the figure “$25,000” and inserting
536 in place thereof the following figure:- $50,000.
537 SECTION 61. Section 44A of said chapter 149, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
538 striking out, in lines 68, 87, 91 and 107, the figure “$50,000”, each time it appears, and inserting
539 in place thereof, in each instance, the following figure:- $75,000.
540 SECTION 62. Said section 44A of said chapter 149, as so appearing, is hereby further
541 amended by striking out, in lines 108, 119 and 127, the figure “$150,000”, each time it appears,
542 and inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the following figure:- $250,000.
543 SECTION 63. Section 44A 1/2 of said chapter 149, as so appearing, is hereby amended
544 by striking out, in line 8, the figure “$1,500,000” and inserting in place thereof the following
545 figure:- $2,500,000.
546 SECTION 64. Section 44F of said chapter 149, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
547 striking out, in lines 6 and 42, the figure “$25,000”, each time it appears, and inserting in place
548 thereof, in each instance, the following figure:- $50,000.
549 SECTION 65. Chapter 152 of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking out
550 section 25A and inserting in place thereof the following section:-
551 Section 25A. In order to promote the health, safety and welfare of employees, every
552 employer shall provide for the payment to their employees of the compensation provided for by
553 this chapter in the following manner:
27 of 43

554 (1) By insurance with an insurer or by membership in a workers' compensation self-
555 insurance group, established pursuant to the provisions of sections 25E to 25U, inclusive, or
556 (2) Subject to the rules of the department, by obtaining from the department annually a
557 license as a self-insurer by conforming to the provisions of 1 of the 2 following subparagraphs
558 and also to the provisions of subparagraph (c) if required. Every employer desiring to be licensed
559 as a self-insurer shall make application for such license on a form provided by the department.
560 The application shall contain: (1) a sworn itemized statement of the assets and liabilities of the
561 applicant; (2) a payroll report for the preceding fiscal year of the applicant; (3) a detailed
562 description of the nature and kind of business carried on.
563 (a) By keeping on deposit with the state treasurer in trust for the benefit and security of
564 employees such amount of securities, not less in market value than $100,000, as may be required
565 by the department, said securities to be in the form of cash, bonds, stocks or other evidences of
566 indebtedness as the department may require, and to be used, liquidated and disbursed only upon
567 order of the department for the purposes of paying the benefits provided for by this chapter. The
568 department shall, at least annually, and at its discretion more frequently, determine the liabilities
569 of a self-insurer both incurred or to be incurred because of personal injuries to employees under
570 this chapter. The department shall require an additional deposit or further security when the sum
571 of the self-insurer's liability both incurred or to be incurred exceeds the deposit or any required
572 reinsurance, or permit a decrease of said deposit provided the value of said deposit in no case
573 shall be less than $100,000. The department may permit a substitution of securities in place of
574 those deposited. Interest, dividends and other income from said deposit or deposits shall be
575 payable to the employer that deposited them, unless the department directs otherwise. The
576 deposit or deposits may be returned to the employer if the employer shall: (i) insures with an
28 of 43

577 insurer under paragraph (1) of this section, or (ii) qualifies as a self-insurer under subparagraph
578 (b) of this section, or (iii) ceases to transact business in the commonwealth; provided, that the
579 employer must demonstrate, to the satisfaction of the department that they are not under any
580 obligation to pay compensation under this chapter, or, if the department so requires, they furnish
581 the department with a single premium non-cancellable policy, insuring the employer against any
582 liability that may have arisen under this chapter, or with a bond executed as surety by some
583 company with a rating of “A” or higher authorized to transact the business of workers'
584 compensation insurance in this commonwealth, in an amount and form approved by the
585 department, guaranteeing the payment of any liability on the employer’s part that may have
586 arisen under this chapter. No deposit so deposited shall be assignable or subject to attachment or
587 be liable in any way for the debt of the self-insurer. If an employer engaged in interstate or
588 foreign commerce certifies that the laws of the United States provide for liability for injury to or
589 death of its employees, the deposit shall be returned to the employer less such amount as
590 determined by the department as necessary to satisfy against liability that may already have
591 arisen under this chapter; and provided that such determination by the department shall be
592 reviewable by the superior court for the county in which the employer resides, or, in the case of a
593 corporation, where said corporation has a principal place of business. Any bond issued pursuant
594 to this paragraph shall remain in full force and effect until a new bond is issued on the same
595 conditions as a bond issued under subsection 2(b) and with an effective date approved by the
596 department, and shall be subject to all provisions of this chapter and 452 CMR 5.00.
597 (b) By furnishing annually a bond running to the commonwealth, with a surety company
598 with a rating of “A” or higher authorized to transact business in the commonwealth as surety, in
599 such form as may be approved by the department and in such amount not less than $100,000 as
29 of 43

600 may be required by the department. Said bond shall be upon the condition that if the license of
601 the principal shall be revoked, or if the principal shall cease to transact business in the
602 commonwealth, or if the department shall refuse to renew the license, or if the principal shall
603 insure with an insurer, then the department may, in its discretion, demand, and the principal then
604 shall, deposit with the state treasurer one of the following: (i) an amount of securities equal to the
605 penal sum of the bond, or (ii) a single premium non-cancellable policy issued by some insurance
606 company authorized to transact the business of workers' compensation insurance in this
607 commonwealth, insuring the principal against any liability that may have arisen under this
608 chapter, or (iii) a bond executed as surety by some company with an “A” rating or above
609 authorized to transact the business aforesaid in this commonwealth, in an amount and form
610 approved by the department, guaranteeing the payment of any liability on the principal’s part that
611 may have arisen under this chapter. Unless the department has made such demand and the
612 principal has made such deposit with the treasurer, such bond shall remain in full force and effect
613 for any and all liabilities of the self-insurer under this chapter. No deposit with the treasurer
614 under this section shall be assignable or subject to attachment or be liable in any way for the debt
615 of the self-insurer.
616 The department shall at least annually determine the liabilities of a self-insurer both
617 incurred or to be incurred because of personal injuries to employees under this chapter. The
618 department may at any time require an additional bond, similarly conditioned, or further security
619 or permit a decrease in the amount of said bond provided the amount of the bond or the bonds in
620 no case shall be less than $100,000. The liability of the surety shall not exceed in the aggregate
621 the penal sum or sums stated in any such annual bond or bonds or in any endorsements giving
622 effect to any such increase or reduction. The department may permit a substitution of a new bond
30 of 43

623 or bonds for the bond or bonds which have been furnished and shall return the old bond or bonds
624 to the self-insurer as soon as a new annual bond has been obtained. Any bond for which the
625 department permits or requires substitution shall remain in full force and effect until a new bond
626 is obtained with an effective date approved by the department. When a surety bond is activated
627 under this chapter, the surety bond company shall, within 10 days of the activation, commence
628 payment of any liabilities that may arise or have arisen under this chapter on behalf of the
629 principal.
630 (c) As a further guarantee of a self-insurer's ability to pay the benefits provided for by
631 this chapter to injured employees, every self-insurer shall make arrangements satisfactory to the
632 department, by reinsurance, to protect it from extraordinary losses or losses caused by one
633 disaster.
634 Such reinsurance shall be in such amounts and form as the department may approve and
635 shall be effected with a company as provided in section 20 of chapter 175, provided, the
636 minimum amount shall be not less than $500,000. Such reinsurance shall provide that the use or
637 disposition of any money received by a self-insurer or former self-insurer under any such
638 reinsurance shall be subject to the approval of the department, and no such money shall be
639 assignable or subject to attachment or be liable in any way for the debt of the self-insurer unless
640 incurred under this chapter. In the event that a surety bond is activated under this section, such
641 reinsurance shall continue and such reinsurer shall continue to make payments on claims for
642 which payments have already commenced, commence payment on claims that reach the
643 retention level set in the applicable reinsurance policy, and, upon exhaustion of the surety bond
644 or development of any deficiency in the bond, commence or continue payments for any liabilities
645 that may arise or have arisen under this chapter.
31 of 43

646 The provisions of this paragraph shall not apply to common carriers by railroad which are
647 subject to the provisions of the federal Employers Liability Act.
648 (3) The department may make rules governing self-insurers, and may revoke or refuse to
649 renew the license of a self-insurer because of the failure of such self-insurer promptly to make
650 payments of compensation provided for by this chapter, or for any other reasonable cause. Any
651 person aggrieved by the action of the department in refusing to grant a license or in revoking, or
652 refusing to renew, a license of a self-insurer under this section or by the action of the department
653 in requiring an additional deposit or further security under paragraph (a) of this section, or in
654 requiring a further bond or security for an additional sum under paragraph (b) of this section may
655 demand a hearing before the department, and if, after said hearing, the department denies their
656 petition, the person may within 10 days after receipt of a notice stating reasons for such denial,
657 file a petition in the superior court for Suffolk county for a review thereof; but the filing of such
658 a petition shall not suspend the action of the department unless a stay thereof shall be allowed by
659 the justice pending a final determination by the court. The court shall summarily hear the petition
660 and may make any appropriate order or decree.
661 (4)(a) The commissioner of insurance shall require each insurer issuing a policy under
662 this chapter to offer, as a part of the policy or as an optional endorsement to the policy,
663 deductibles, including reasonable small deductibles optional to the policyholder for benefits
664 payable under this chapter. Deductible amounts offered shall be fully disclosed to the prospective
665 policyholders in writing in amounts determined by the commissioner. The policyholder
666 exercising the deductible option shall choose only 1 deductible amount.
32 of 43

667 (b) If the policyholder exercises the option and chooses a deductible, the insured
668 employer shall be liable for the amount of the deductible for benefits paid for each compensable
669 claim of work injury suffered by an employee or, at the option of the policyholder, an aggregate
670 deductible as determined by the commissioner. The insurer shall pay all or part of the deductible
671 amount, whichever is applicable, to a compensable claim, to the person or medical provider
672 entitled to the benefits conferred by this chapter and then seek reimbursement from the insured
673 employer for the applicable deductible amount. The payment or nonpayment of deductible
674 amounts by the insured employer to the insurer shall be treated under the policy insuring the
675 liability for workers' compensation in the same manner as payment or nonpayment of premiums.
676 (c) Optional deductibles shall be offered in each policy insuring liability for workers'
677 compensation that is issued, delivered, issued for delivery, or renewed under this chapter on or
678 after a date to be determined by the commissioner, unless an insured employer and insurer agree
679 to renegotiate a workers' compensation policy in effect, so as to include a provision allowing for
680 a deductible.
681 (d) Premium reductions for deductibles shall be determined by the commissioner of
682 insurance. The commissioner of insurance may adopt rules or promulgate regulations to enforce
683 the provisions of this section relative to workers’ compensation insurance deductibles.
684 (e) This subsection shall not apply to employers who are approved to self-insure against
685 liability for workers' compensation or group self-insurance funds for workers' compensation
686 established pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.
687 (f) The commissioner of insurance may promulgate regulations to enforce the provisions
688 of this section.
33 of 43

689 SECTION 66. Subsection (t) of section 3 of chapter 161A of the General Laws, as
690 appearing in the 2024 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 162, the figure
691 “$15,000,000” and inserting in place thereof the following figure:- $30,000,000.
692 SECTION 67. Section 7 of chapter 175M of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024
693 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in lines 26, 66, 70 and 75, the figure “140”,
694 each time it appears, and inserting in place thereof the following figure:- 120.
695 SECTION 68. Section 10 of chapter 183A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024
696 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in subsection (j), the words “The declarant
697 shall not” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- Except as otherwise provided for
698 pursuant to section 25, the declarant shall not.
699 SECTION 69. Said chapter 183A of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the
700 following section:-
701 Section 25. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall have the following
702 meanings unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
703 “Eligible costs”, expenditures for the construction and development of a condominium
704 and the units thereof, including, but not limited to, materials, labor, demolition, pre-construction
705 design and site clearing costs, and other similar costs as may be designated by regulation.
706 “Eligible costs escrow account”, an account in a financial institution located in the
707 commonwealth where a pre-construction deposit for eligible costs is held by an escrow agent.
708 “Escrow agent”, a third-party holder of a pre-construction deposit held in an eligible costs
709 escrow account pursuant to this section, and shall include a licensed title insurance company, an
34 of 43

710 attorney, a licensed real estate broker or an institution whose accounts are insured by a
711 governmental agency or instrumentality, or any other person as provided for by regulation.
712 “Person”, a natural person, partnership, whether general or limited and whether domestic
713 or foreign, limited liability company, foreign limited liability company, trust, estate, association,
714 corporation, custodian, nominee or any other individual or entity.
715 “Pre-construction deposit”, funds delivered by a prospective purchaser of a unit prior to
716 the substantial completion thereof, where the seller and prospective purchaser mutually agree in
717 writing that a portion of such funds may be used for eligible costs.
718 “Prospective purchaser”, a person who has made an offer to purchase a unit that is part of
719 a condominium.
720 “Seller”, a person that is constructing or causing to be constructed any unit that is a part
721 of a condominium.
722 “Substantial completion”, the issuance of a certificate of occupancy for the entire
723 building where the unit is located.
724 (b) Notwithstanding subsection (j) of section 10, a seller and prospective purchaser may,
725 by mutual written agreement, authorize the seller to use not more than 90 per cent of a pre-
726 construction deposit for eligible costs; provided, that such written agreement shall be
727 incorporated into any contract for the sale of the unit or any purchase and sale agreement for the
728 unit, whichever is executed first.
729 (c) (1) A written agreement pursuant to subsection (b) shall contain the following:
35 of 43

730 (i) A provision that requires the pre-construction deposit to be held in an eligible costs
731 escrow account;
732 (ii) A provision that requires the seller to obtain and maintain a surety bond, letter of
733 credit or other financial guarantee as a condition to withdraw funds from the eligible costs
734 escrow account in accordance with paragraph (3);
735 (iii) A provision that requires not less than 10 per cent of a pre-construction deposit held
736 in an eligible costs escrow account to be held in such escrow account during the pendency of a
737 transaction until the transaction is consummated or terminated;
738 (iv) The following statement in boldfaced type or capital letters no smaller than the
739 largest type on the first page of such agreement:
740 “PRE-CONSTRUCTION DEPOSITS MADE PRIOR TO CLOSING PURSUANT TO
741 THIS CONTRACT MAY BE USED FOR CONSTRUCTION PURPOSES BY THE SELLER
742 TO THE EXTENT ALLOWED BY THIS AGREEMENT AND M.G.L. c. 183A, § 25.”; and
743 (v) Any other provisions required by regulations promulgated by the executive office of
744 housing and livable communities pursuant to subsection (e).
745 (2) A pre-construction deposit delivered by a prospective purchaser pursuant to an
746 agreement executed in accordance with paragraph (1) shall be held in an eligible costs escrow
747 account until:
748 (i) refunded to the prospective purchaser;
749 (ii) delivered to the seller at closing;
36 of 43

750 (iii) delivered to the seller upon the prospective purchaser’s default; or
751 (iv) distributed to the seller in accordance with paragraph (3).
752 (3) Funds held in an eligible costs escrow account may be distributed to the seller or its
753 designee for eligible costs only if and to the extent:
754 (i) the agreement executed pursuant to paragraph (1) describes the extent to which a pre-
755 construction deposit may be used to pay for eligible costs;
756 (ii) the seller provides to the escrow agent: (A) a copy of the agreement executed
757 pursuant to paragraph (1); (B) a reasonably detailed description of the eligible costs to be paid by
758 the distribution from the eligible costs escrow account; and (C) any of the following: (i) a surety
759 bond issued by a licensed third-party surety company in an amount equivalent to or greater than
760 the amount of pre-construction deposit being requested, ensuring repayment to the escrow agent
761 or prospective purchaser if the seller fails to deliver the unit in a timely manner or to the extent
762 the prospective purchaser is entitled to such return pursuant to and subject to the agreement
763 executed pursuant to paragraph (1), (ii) an irrevocable letter of credit obtained by the seller, for at
764 least the full amount of the pre-construction deposit held in an eligible costs escrow account,
765 ensuring repayment to the escrow agent or prospective purchaser if the seller fails to deliver the
766 unit in a timely manner or to the extent the prospective purchaser is entitled to such return
767 pursuant to and subject to the agreement executed pursuant to paragraph (1) or (iii) any other
768 equivalent financial guarantee as may be authorized by the executive office of housing and
769 livable communities pursuant to subsection (e).
770 (d) An escrow agent who in good faith releases all or any portion of the funds in
771 accordance with this section and pursuant to the agreement executed pursuant to subsection (b)
37 of 43

772 shall have no obligation to monitor the progress of construction or the expenditure of the funds
773 by the seller and shall not be liable to the prospective purchaser for the release of funds in
774 accordance with said agreement.
775 (e) The executive office of housing and livable communities may promulgate regulations
776 for the administration of this section.
777 SECTION 70. Section 15 of chapter 207 of the General Laws is hereby repealed.
778 SECTION 71. Chapter 731 of the acts of 1945, as amended by chapters 210 and 581 of
779 the acts of 1946, is hereby repealed.
780 SECTION 72. Chapter 210 of the acts of 1946, as amended by chapter 581 of the acts of
781 1946, is hereby repealed.
782 SECTION 73. Chapter 581 of the acts of 1946 is hereby repealed.
783 SECTION 74. Chapter 440 of the acts of 1953 is hereby repealed.
784 SECTION 75. Chapter 646 of the acts of 1968, as amended by chapter 325 of the acts of
785 1969, is hereby repealed.
786 SECTION 76. Chapter 325 of the acts of 1969 is hereby repealed.
787 SECTION 77. Subsection (e) of section 9 of chapter 152 of the acts of 1997 is hereby
788 amended by inserting after the word “Fund” the following words:- and provided further, that the
789 surcharge shall not apply to vehicular rental transaction contracts entered into with a car-sharing
790 organization, as defined in section 32J of chapter 90 of the General Laws,.
791 SECTION 78. Section 16 of chapter 130 of the acts of 2005 is hereby repealed.
38 of 43

792 SECTION 79. Section 71 of chapter 10 of the acts of 2015, as amended by chapter 146 of
793 the acts of 2020, is hereby further amended by striking out the figure “2026” and inserting in
794 place thereof the following figure:- 2032.
795 SECTION 80. Chapter 183 of the acts of 2022 is hereby amended by striking out section
796 4 and inserting in place thereof the following section:-
797 SECTION 4. The parcels of land that may be transferred to the department of agricultural
798 resources pursuant to section 3 contain approximately 175 acres, and are shown as the
799 agricultural fields numbered 4, 5, 10, 11, 12, 13, 14A, 14C, 15, 16, 17, 18, 19, 20 and 22 on the
800 plan entitled “Plan of Land in Templeton, MA” prepared by Northeast Survey Consultants and
801 dated July 27, 2017 on file with the division of capital asset management and maintenance,
802 subject to modifications pursuant to section 3 and the parcel shown as AF 13 and the western
803 portion of AF1 containing approximately 54 acres on the plan entitled “Plan of Land in
804 Templeton, MA & Phillipston MA” prepared by Northeast Survey Consultants and dated March
805 18, 2025 and recorded in Worcester County Registry of Deeds Plan Book 983, Plan 11.
806 SECTION 81. Said chapter 183 is hereby further amended by striking out section 6 and
807 inserting in place thereof the following section:-
808 SECTION 6. The agricultural fields and parcels that may be conveyed pursuant to section
809 5 are the agricultural fields numbered 2, 3, 6, 7, 8, 9 and 14B and the parcels labeled LA 2, LA 3
810 and LA 4 on the plan entitled “Plan of Land in Templeton, MA” prepared by Northeast Survey
811 Consultants and dated July 27, 2017 on file with the division of capital asset management and
812 maintenance, subject to modifications pursuant to section 5, and the parcels shown as SP2, SP6
813 and the eastern portion of AF1 containing approximately 10 acres on the plan entitled “Plan of
39 of 43

814 Land in Templeton, MA & Phillipston MA” prepared by Northeast Survey Consultants and dated
815 March 18, 2025 and recorded in Worcester County Registry of Deeds Plan Book 983, Plan 11.
816 SECTION 82. Item 1596-2511 of section 2A of chapter 7 of the acts of 2025 is hereby
817 amended by adding the following words:- ; provided further, that the commissioner of early
818 education and care may transfer funds from this item to items 3000-3060 and 3000-4060.
819 SECTION 83. Item 7004-0101 of section 2 of chapter 9 of the acts of 2025 is hereby
820 amended by striking out the figure “115” and inserting in place thereof the following figure:-
821 120.
822 SECTION 84. Said item 7004-0101 of said section 2 of said chapter 9 is hereby further
823 amended by striking out the figure “2025” and inserting in place thereof the following figure:-
824 2026.
825 SECTION 85. Item 7004-9315 of section 2 of chapter 9 of the acts of 2025 is hereby
826 amended by striking out the figure “$3,571,512”, each time it appears, and inserting in place
827 thereof, in each instance, the following figure:- $5,571,512.
828 SECTION 86. Item 7010-0005 in section 2 of chapter 9 of the acts of 2025 is hereby
829 amended by striking out the words “June 30, 2026” and inserting in place thereof the following
830 words:- January 31, 2027.
831 SECTION 87. Item 8100-0102 of section 2 of chapter 9 of the acts of 2025 is hereby
832 amended by striking out the figure “$52,000,000”, each time it appears, and inserting in place
833 thereof, in each instance, the following figure:- $55,000,000.
40 of 43

834 SECTION 88. Section 100 of chapter 9 of the acts of 2025 is hereby amended by striking
835 out the figure “2025” and inserting in place thereof the following figure:- 2026.
836 SECTION 89. Notwithstanding sections 32 to 37, inclusive, of chapter 7C of the General
837 Laws or any other general or special law to the contrary, the commissioner of capital asset
838 management and maintenance may, in consultation with University of Massachusetts,
839 Bridgewater State University and Massasoit Community College, transfer the care and control of
840 226-236B Main street in the city of Brockton from the University of Massachusetts, Bridgewater
841 State University and Massasoit Community College to the executive office of labor and
842 workforce development. The parcel of land to be transferred to the executive office of labor and
843 workforce development is more particularly described in a deed recorded in the Plymouth county
844 registry of deeds in certificate of title number 121531, document number 728933.
845 SECTION 90. Notwithstanding section 23 of chapter 59 of the General Laws, section
846 31D of chapter 44 of the General Laws or any other general or special law to the contrary, a city
847 or town may amortize over fiscal years 2027 to 2029, inclusive, in equal installments or more
848 rapidly, the amount of its snow and ice removal deficit for fiscal year 2026. The commissioner of
849 revenue shall issue guidelines or instructions for reporting the amortization of deficits authorized
850 by this section. The local appropriating authority, as defined in section 21C of said chapter 59,
851 shall adopt a deficit amortization schedule in accordance with the department of revenue’s
852 guidelines or instructions under this section before setting the municipality’s fiscal year 2027 tax
853 rate.
854 SECTION 91. Notwithstanding section 23 of chapter 59 of the General Laws, section 31
855 of chapter 44 of the General Laws or any other general or special law to the contrary, with the
41 of 43

856 approval of the director of accounts, a city or town may amortize over the subsequent 3 fiscal
857 years, in equal installments or more rapidly, the amount of its deficit related to the outbreak of
858 the 2019 novel coronavirus, also known as COVID-19, and subsequent variants. The
859 commissioner of revenue shall issue guidelines or instructions for reporting the amortization of
860 deficits authorized by this section. The local appropriating authority, as defined in section 21C of
861 said chapter 59, shall adopt a deficit amortization schedule in accordance with the department of
862 revenue’s guidelines or instructions under this section before setting the municipality’s next
863 fiscal year tax rate.
864 SECTION 92. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, in each of
865 fiscal years 2026 and 2027, the comptroller, at the direction of the secretary of administration
866 and finance, shall transfer from the General Fund to the Massachusetts Offshore Wind Industry
867 Investment Trust Fund established in section 9A of chapter 23J of the General Laws an amount
868 not to exceed $35,000,000; provided, that not less than 15 days in advance of the transfer, the
869 secretary shall certify the amount to be transferred, to the chairs of the senate and house
870 committees on ways and means.
871 SECTION 93. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for fiscal year
872 2026, the secretary of administration and finance shall transfer funds from the Communications
873 Access Trust Fund established pursuant to section 2XXXXX of chapter 29 of the General Laws
874 in the following manner: $10,000,000 to the department of correction; $1,653,987 to the Bristol
875 sheriff's office; $108,712 to the Hampshire sheriff's office; $429,193 to the Berkshire sheriff's
876 office; $567,296 to the Barnstable sheriff's office; $15,152 to the Dukes County sheriff's office;
877 $1,552,291 to the Essex sheriff's office; $392,076 to the Franklin sheriff's office; $538,188 to the
878 Hampden sheriff's office; $1,525,788 to the Middlesex sheriff's office; $784,043 to the Norfolk
42 of 43

879 sheriff's office; $1,199,999 to the Plymouth sheriff's office; $2,191,927 to the Suffolk sheriff's
880 office; and $1,562,237 to the Worcester sheriff's office; provided, however, that the secretary
881 may amend transfer amounts based on actual costs incurred and shall certify final transfer
882 amounts to the house and senate committee on ways and means no fewer than 15 days before
883 making any such transfers.
884 SECTION 94. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, to account for
885 any timing discrepancy presented by the initial application of paragraph (i) of subsection (b) of
886 section 2EEEEEEof chapter 29 of the General Laws relating to the Commonwealth Federal
887 Matching and Debt Reduction Fund, said section shall not apply to the determination of the
888 applicability of fiscal year 2026 interest transfers.
889 SECTION 95. Section 20 shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
890 SECTION 96. Sections 29 and 30 shall take effect July 1, 2027.
891 SECTION 97. Section 46 shall take effect 1 year after the effective date of this act.
43 of 43